Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Sections 2 to 4 of this  2019 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 178.200
to 178.245.
SECTION 2. (1) It is an unlawful practice under  ORS chapter 659A for an employer to fail
to comply with the requirements of the plan developed under ORS 178.205.
(2) An employee may file  a complaint with the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and
Industries in the manner provided by ORS 659A.820, alleging an  unlawful practice under this
section. A complaint may not be filed earlier than two years  following the date by which an
employer is  required to register with the plan, as prescribed by the Oregon Retirement
Savings Board by rule.
SECTION 3.  (1) Upon receiving an employee complaint under section 2 of this 2019 Act
or upon request of  the Oregon Retirement Savings Board under ORS 178.205, the Commis-
sioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries  may make inquiries and investigations in the
same manner as provided under ORS 659A.835.
(2) If the  commissioner issues a final order determining that an employer engaged in an
unlawful practice under section 2 of this 2019 Act,  the commissioner may impose civil pen-
alties under section 5 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries shall inform
the Oregon Retirement Savings Board of any final orders issued under section 3 of this  2019
Act.
(2) The board shall include  the commissioner’s final order determinations related to
employers’ compliance in the annual reports described in ORS 178.235.
SECTION 5. (1)(a) In addition to any other penalty provided by  law, the Commissioner
of the Bureau of Labor and Industries may assess against an employer who has engaged in
an unlawful practice under section 2 of this 2019 Act a civil penalty in an  amount up to $100
for each employee who is eligible to participate in the  plan developed under ORS 178.205, not
to exceed an aggregate amount of $5,000 in a calendar year.
(b) The commissioner may, upon a showing of any mitigating  or aggravating circum-
stances, adjust the amount of a civil penalty imposed under this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 164 (SB 164-A) Page 1
(2) Civil penalties assessed under this section shall  be imposed in the manner provided
in ORS 183.745.
(3) Civil penalties recovered under this section shall be applied first  toward reimbursing
costs incurred by the commissioner in conducting inquiries and investigations under  section
3 of this 2019 Act. Any remaining amounts shall be deposited  in the Oregon Retirement
Savings Plan Administrative Fund established under ORS 178.225  and made available for ad-
ministrative costs and expenses of the Oregon Retirement Savings Board.
SECTION 6.  ORS 178.205 is amended to read:
178.205. (1) The Oregon Retirement Savings Board shall develop a defined  contribution retire-
ment plan for persons employed for compensation in  this state and conduct a market and legal
analysis of the plan.
(2) The board shall have the following powers:
(a) To establish, implement and maintain the plan developed under this section.
(b) To adopt rules for the general administration of the plan as provided in ORS 178.215.
(c) To direct the investment of the funds contributed to accounts in the plan  consistent with the
investment restrictions established by the  board. The investment restrictions must be consistent
with the  objectives of the plan, and the board shall exercise the judgment and care then prevailing
that persons of  prudence, discretion and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs
with due regard to the  probable income and level of risk from certain types of investments of money,
in accordance with the policies established by the board.
(d) To collect application, account  or administrative fees to defray the costs of administering the
plan.
(e) To make  and enter into contracts, agreements or arrangements, and to retain, employ and
contract for any of the following considered necessary or desirable, for carrying  out the purposes
set forth in ORS 178.200 to 178.245:
(A) Services of private and public financial institutions, depositories, consultants,  investment
advisers, investment administrators and third-party plan administrators.
(B) Research, technical and other services.
(C) Services of other state agencies to assist the board in its duties.
(f) To evaluate the need for, and procure as needed, pooled private insurance of the plan.
(g) To develop and implement an  outreach plan to gain input and disseminate information re-
garding the plan and retirement savings in general.
(h) To request that the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries  investigate
an employer under  section 3 of this 2019 Act to determine the employer’s compliance with
the requirements of the defined contribution retirement plan developed  under this section,
if, after three attempts, using different  means of communication when available, to bring the
employer into compliance, the board has reasonable grounds to believe  that the employer
remains in violation of the requirements of the plan.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 178.215 is amended to read:
178.215. The Oregon Retirement Savings Board shall adopt rules that:
(1) Establish the process for voluntary enrollment in the plan developed under ORS  178.205, in-
cluding procedures for automatic enrollment of employees and for employees to opt out  of the plan.
(2) Establish the process for participants to make the default contributions to  plan accounts and
to adjust the contribution levels.
(3) Establish the process  for employers to withhold employee contributions to plan accounts
from employees’ wages and send the contributions to the investment administrator for the plan.
(4) Establish the process for allowing employees to opt out of enrollment in the plan.
(5) Establish the process for participants to make nonpayroll contributions to plan accounts.
(6) Set minimum, maximum and default  contribution levels in accordance with limits established
by the Internal Revenue Code.
(7) Establish the process for withdrawals from plan accounts.
Enrolled Senate Bill 164 (SB 164-A) Page 2
(8) Establish the process and requirements for an employer to obtain  an exemption from offering
the plan if the employer offers a qualified retirement plan, including but not limited to a plan qual-
ified under section 401(a), section 401(k), section 403(a),  section 403(b), section 408(k), section 408(p)
or section 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(9) Mandate the contents and frequency of required disclosures to  employees, employers and
other plan participants. These disclosures must include, but need not be limited to:
(a) The benefits and risks associated with making contributions to the plan;
(b) Instructions for making contributions to the plan;
(c) How to opt out of the plan;
(d) How to participate in the plan with a level of contributions other than the default rate;
(e) The process for withdrawal of retirement savings;
(f) How to obtain additional information about the plan;
(g) That employees seeking financial advice  should contact financial advisers, that participating
employers are not in a position  to provide financial advice and that participating employers are not
liable for decisions employees make pursuant to ORS 178.200 to 178.245;
(h) That the plan is not an employer-sponsored retirement plan; [ and]
(i) That the plan accounts and rate of return are not guaranteed by the state[ .]; and
(j) That employees may file a complaint under section  2 of this 2019 Act to report an
employer’s failure to offer an opportunity to contribute to the plan developed under ORS
178.205 or another qualified retirement plan.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 178.225 is amended to read:
178.225. (1) The Oregon Retirement Savings Plan Administrative  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Retirement
Savings Plan Administrative  Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously
appropriated to the Oregon Retirement Savings Board.
(2) The Oregon Retirement Savings Plan Administrative Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund from the federal government, other state  agencies or local
governments;
(c) Moneys from the payment of fees and the payment of other moneys due the board;
(d) Any gifts or donations made to the State of Oregon for deposit in the fund; [ and]
(e) Earnings on moneys in the fund[ .]; and
(f) Moneys from civil penalties recovered under section 5 of this 2019 Act.
(3) The board may use  the moneys in the fund to pay the administrative costs and expenses of
the board and the plan developed under ORS 178.205 and  for any other purpose described in ORS
178.200 to 178.245.
Enrolled Senate Bill 164 (SB 164-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate March 26, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 164 (SB 164-A) Page 4